Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-972
Water service districts; failure to comply with regulation or make connection; effect; special assessment.

If any property owner shall neglect or fail, for ten days after notice either by personal service or by publication in a legal newspaper in the manner prescribed in section 17-971, to comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to section 17-970 or to make any required connections, the governing body may cause the compliance or connections to be done and assess the cost against the property as a special assessment and collect the special assessment in the manner provided for other special assessments.

Laws 1967, c. 73, § 3, p. 238;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 39.